Illinois, session 104th, SB694.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Housing is Recovery Pilot Program Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 125/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Housing is Recovery Pilot Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-66, eff. 7-9-21.)